Maine, session 132, LD1571.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §2412, sub-§6, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 414, §5, is
amended to read:
B. All full-time teachers in a public charter school must either hold an appropriate
teaching certificate or become certified within 3 years of the date they are hired, except
for those with an advanced degree, professional certification or unique expertise or
experience in the curricular area in which they teach.
This paragraph is repealed August 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §2412, sub-§6, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. Beginning August 1, 2026, all full-time teachers in a public charter school must
hold an appropriate teaching certificate.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §13019-H, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 442, §2 and
reallocated by RR 2023, c. 1, Pt. A, §7, is amended to read:
6. Reissuance; retired educational technician. The commissioner may issue an
educational technician certificate to a person who has been receiving a retirement benefit
from the State Employee and Teacher Retirement Program established under Title 5,
section 17602 for no more than 5 years until July 31, 2026 and for no more than 3 years
beginning August 1, 2026 and who, immediately prior to receiving that benefit, possessed
an active educational technician certificate in good standing that has subsequently lapsed.
An educational technician certificate issued under this subsection is for the same period
and subject to the same renewal standards as specified in subsection 3. State board rules
may further govern qualifications for an educational technician certificate issued under this
subsection.
Page 1 - 132LR1563(03)